New York, session 2025-2026, A10432.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. Music and performing arts education 2 programs are proven to be effective at lowering the recidivism rates of 3 incarcerated individuals. While the three-year recidivism rate in New 4 York is sixty percent, participants in arts education programs have a 5 recidivism rate of only three percent. Understanding how to expand music 6 and performing arts education programs in state prisons will help ensure 7 incarcerated individuals are able to become well integrated members of 8 society after they have served their sentences. This legislation will 9 create a temporary state commission to study and make recommendations on 10 how to expand music and performing arts education programs for youth and 11 adults in New York state correctional facilities. 12 § 2. (a) A temporary state commission is hereby created to study 13 current music and performing arts education programs in New York state 14 correctional facilities, and to make recommendations on how to expand 15 these programs. The commission shall study programs for both youth and 16 adult incarcerated individuals. 17 (b) 1. The commission shall consist of eleven members, to be appointed 18 as follows: five members shall be appointed by the governor, of which 19 one shall be from the department of corrections and community super- 20 vision, one shall be from the New York state council on the arts, and at 21 least one shall be a formerly incarcerated individual; two members shall 22 be appointed by the temporary president of the senate; two members shall 23 be appointed by the speaker of the assembly; one member shall be 24 appointed by the minority leader of the senate; and one member shall be 25 appointed by the minority leader of the assembly. The commission shall 26 elect a member to serve as chair. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15091-02-6 A. 10432 2 1 2. The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for 2 their services but shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses 3 incurred in the performance of their duties under this act. The commis- 4 sion may employ and at pleasure remove such personnel as it may deem 5 necessary for the performance of its functions and fix their compen- 6 sation within the amounts made available by appropriation therefor. 7 (c) The commission may request and shall receive from any agency in 8 the state and from any subdivision, department, board, bureau, commis- 9 sion, office, agency or other instrumentality of the state or of any 10 political subdivision thereof such facilities, assistance and data as it 11 deems necessary or desirable for the proper execution of its powers and 12 duties and to effectuate the purposes set forth in this act. 13 (d) The report shall include any recommendations for legislative 14 action as it may deem necessary and appropriate and shall be delivered 15 to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, the speaker of 16 the assembly, and posted on the website of the secretary of state no 17 later than one year after the effective date of this act. The report 18 shall also be posted on the website of the governor. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 20 deemed repealed 2 years after such date.